Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF1754.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin CLOQUET FORESTRY CENTER; LAND TRANSFER.new text end new text begin (a) The commissioner of administration must convey for no consideration all state-owned land within boundaries of the Cloquet Forestry Center to the Board of Regents of the University of Minnesota to facilitate the university's goal of returning this land to the Fond du Lac Band of Lake Superior Chippewa. new text end new text begin (b) The conveyance must be in a form approved by the attorney general. The attorney general may make changes to the land description to correct errors and ensure accuracy. new text end new text begin (c) The land to be conveyed is located in Carlton County and is described as follows: new text end new text begin (1) the Southeast Quarter of the Northwest Quarter of Section 30, Township 49 North, Range 17 West; new text end new text begin (2) the East Half of the Northeast Quarter of Section 36, Township 49 North, Range 18 West; new text end new text begin (3) the Northwest Quarter of the Southeast Quarter of Section 29, Township 49 North, Range 17 West; new text end new text begin (4) the Northwest Quarter of the Northwest Quarter of Section 29, Township 49 North, Range 17 West; new text end new text begin (5) the Northwest Quarter of the Southwest Quarter (or Lot 3) of Section 30, Township 49 North, Range 17 West; new text end new text begin (6) the Southwest Quarter of the Northwest Quarter (or Lot 2) of Section 31, Township 49 North, Range 17 West; new text end new text begin (7) the Southeast Quarter of the Northeast Quarter of Section 32, Township 49 North, Range 17 West; and new text end new text begin (8) the North Half of the Northeast Quarter of Section 32, Township 49 North, Range 17 West. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end Sec. 2. new text begin APPROPRIATION.new text end new text begin $1,300,000 in fiscal year 2026 is appropriated from the general fund to the commissioner of management and budget to prepay and defease any outstanding state general obligation bonds used for improvements and betterments at the University of Minnesota Cloquet Forestry Center, and other associated financing costs to facilitate the university's goal of returning this land to the Fond du Lac Band of Lake Superior Chippewa. This amount may be deposited, invested, and applied to accomplish the purposes of this section as provided in Minnesota Statutes, section 475.67, subdivisions 5 to 10 and 13. Upon the prepayment and defeasance of all associated debt on the real property and improvements, all conditions set forth in Minnesota Statutes, section 16A.695, subdivision 3, shall be deemed to have been satisfied and the real property and improvements shall no longer constitute state bond financed property under Minnesota Statutes, section 16A.695. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end